California statutes. Water Code
It is declared to be the responsibility of the State of California to assist local governments in providing certain essential services and facilities where water resource construction projects financed, in whole or in part, by the State or by the State jointly with the federal government create an undue burden on a local area’s ability to provide these services and facilities. State responsibility for providing financial assistance under such circumstances includes the following: police and fire protection, public health and hospitals, sanitation, emergency and indigent relief, and such other activities for which there is a demonstrated urgent need and which are approved by the State Department of Finance and the State Department of Water Resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 464.)
-------------------------------------------

12951.

State expenditures and loans for aid to local governments provided in accordance with the provisions of this part are a part of the project cost of the project giving rise to the creation of the impact area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 464.)
-------------------------------------------

12952.

The Governor may designate, from time to time, and may revoke previous designations of, the area within a 20-mile airline radius of the site of principal construction of any water construction project undertaken by the State as an impact area when:

(a) He is requested to do so by the county board of supervisors or the city council of any county or city within the impact area; and

(b) He finds that:

(1) Such construction will cause a sudden influx of people into the impact area.

(2) The construction will require more than 12 months to complete.

(3) The construction will result in serious fiscal problems to the affected local governments.

(4) Peak construction employment on the project within the impact area is estimated by the Department of Water Resources to total more than 500 employees.

(5) The increase in population in the impact area, found by multiplying such peak construction employment as estimated by the Department of Water Resources by 4.5, equals at least 20 percent of the estimated population in the area on July 1st of the year prior to the date that construction was started. At any time that the increase in population falls below 20 percent of the estimated population of the area, the designation shall terminate as of the following June 30th. All population data are to be determined by the Department of Finance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 464.)
-------------------------------------------

12953.

For the purposes of this part the Department of Water Resources shall designate the site of principal construction of every water construction project undertaken by the State, and the date construction was started.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 464.)
-------------------------------------------

12954.

As used in this part, “peak employment” means the largest number of persons employed in any one year at a site of principal construction and at such other sites as may be related directly thereto within the impact area by the Department of Water Resources, contractors and subcontractors in connection with the construction project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 464.)
-------------------------------------------

12955.

Requests by any city, county, or district to have an area designated an impact area may be made at any time after the authorization of a water resources project by the Legislature. Except with respect to assistance during the first year of construction or during the first year after enactment of a law providing state aid, requests for financial assistance under provisions of this part shall be made at least six months prior to the beginning of the fiscal year for which the assistance is requested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 464.)
-------------------------------------------

12956.

When an impact area has been designated by the Governor the State will pay:

(a) The increased operating expenses necessitated by population increase within the impact area for maintenance of police and fire protection, public hospitals, public health and sanitation and such other activities as may be approved by the Department of Finance and the Department of Water Resources at the same level of service as prevailed within or for the impact area prior to the start of the construction. A subsequent increase in the level of a specific service may be approved by the State Department of Finance. Level of service shall be measured by the ratio of personnel or facilities serving the impact area to the total population within the same area. The portion of the construction-generated population expected to reside within the impact area shall be estimated by the Department of Water Resources for each fiscal year in which the State provides financial assistance under this part to any governmental agency.

(b) Seventy-five percent of the increased cost to the county of emergency and indigent relief provided by the county under the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing at Section 2500) of Division 4 of the Welfare and Institutions Code at standards that existed prior to the start of construction. An increase in such standards may be approved by the State Department of Finance. The State will also pay all necessary increased costs resulting from personnel, office, and automobile expenses created by an increase in the emergency and indigent caseload, as determined by the Department of Finance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 464.)
-------------------------------------------

12957.

Funds for capital outlay expenditures for police and fire protection, essential health services, and water and sewerage systems required to serve the expanded population in the impact area may be provided to any city, county, or district rendering, in whole or in part, any of the services described in Section 12950, upon their application under either or both of the following options to be exercised by the local governing bodies:

(a) A loan by the State to the local agency for all or any part of such expenditures; such loans to be entirely repaid within 30 years at a rate of interest one-quarter of 1 percent higher than the interest cost to the State for long-term loans at the time of the loan.

(b) Direct state expenditures to meet all or any part of such needs. Direct state expenditures shall be for temporary facilities which shall be dismantled upon completion of the water project construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 464.)
-------------------------------------------

12958.

Upon the designation of an impact area by the Governor, the State Department of Finance shall recommend the appropriation of funds and the division of state assistance among the local governments in the impact area. For this purpose the State Department of Finance shall be given access to such records and documents as may be necessary to accomplish this objective by the affected local governments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 464.)
-------------------------------------------

12959.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, except as to projects constructed by the Department of Water Resources, the maximum amount of money paid under this part shall not exceed that proportion of the total cost of the needed assistance as the amount of the State’s financial participation in a project bears to the total cost of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 464.)
-------------------------------------------

12960.

When certified by the Department of Water Resources, claims of local agencies for state financial assistance shall be presented to the State Controller for payment out of funds made available therefor. The State Controller shall make such audit as he deems necessary, before or after disbursement, for the purpose of determining that any money received by any city, county, or district as state financial assistance hereunder has been expended for the purposes and under the conditions authorized under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 464.)
-------------------------------------------

12961.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Byrne Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 464.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8. WATER AGENCY RECREATIONAL FACILITIES [12970. - 12973.]

12970.

“Water agency,” as used in this part means any public corporation, district, political subdivision, or any other agency or authority now or hereafter organized under the laws of this state which develops, stores, distributes or supplies water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 214.)
-------------------------------------------

12971.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, every water agency is authorized, in addition to and not in derogation or limitation of the powers conferred upon such agency by any other law, through contract or otherwise, to construct, maintain, improve, and operate recreational facilities appurtenant to any land, dams, reservoirs, facilities, or works appropriate or ancillary to such recreational use owned, operated, or contracted to be operated by such agency. Any contract for construction or improvement work under this part shall be subject to all applicable provisions of law governing contracts of the water agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 214.)
-------------------------------------------

12972.

A water agency may expend funds on such recreational facilities and may fix and assess reasonable charges for the use of such recreational facilities by members of the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 214.)
-------------------------------------------

12973.

The governing body of a water agency may adopt regulations binding upon all persons covering the use of such recreational facilities. Any violation of such regulations is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 214.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 9. DELTA LEVEE MAINTENANCE [12980. - 12995.]

12980.

As used in this part:

(a) “Board” means the Central Valley Flood Protection Board.

(b) “Delta” means the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta as described in Section 12220.

(c) “Local agency” means any city, county, district, or other political subdivision of the state which is authorized to maintain levees.

(d) “Net long-term habitat improvement” means enhancement of riparian, fisheries, and wildlife habitat.

(e) “Nonproject levee” means a local flood
 control levee in the delta that is not a project facility under the State Water Resources Law of 1945, as shown on page 38 of the Department of Water Resources “Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Atlas,” dated 1993.

(f) “Project levee” means a federal flood control levee, as shown on page 40 of the Department of Water Resources “Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Atlas,” dated 1993, that is a project facility under the State Water Resources Law of 1945 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of Part 6), if not less than a majority of the acreage within the jurisdiction of the local agency that maintains the levee is within the primary zone of the delta, as defined in Section 29728 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 549, Sec. 1.   (SB 200)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12981.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the delta is endowed with many invaluable and unique resources and that these resources are of major statewide significance.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that the delta’s uniqueness is particularly characterized by its hundreds of miles of meandering waterways and the many islands adjacent thereto; that, in order to preserve the delta’s invaluable resources, which include highly productive agriculture, recreational assets, fisheries, and wildlife environment, the physical characteristics of the delta should be preserved essentially in their present form; and that the key to preserving the delta’s physical characteristics is the system of levees defining the waterways and producing the adjacent islands. However, the Legislature recognizes that it may not be economically justifiable to maintain all delta islands.

(c) The Legislature further finds and declares that funds necessary to maintain and improve the delta’s levees to protect the delta’s physical characteristics should be used to fund levee work that would promote agricultural and habitat uses in the delta consistent with the purpose of preserving the delta’s invaluable resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 601, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12982.

The Legislature further finds and declares that while most of the delta’s levees are privately owned and maintained they are being subjected to varied multiple uses and serve to benefit many varied segments and interests of the public at large, and that as a result of the varied multiple uses of such levees, added maintenance costs are being borne by adjacent landowners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 717.)
-------------------------------------------

12983.

The Legislature further finds and declares that there is an urgent need for a higher degree of levee maintenance and rehabilitation generally throughout the delta and that the state has an interest in providing technical and financial assistance for delta levee maintenance and rehabilitation.

The Legislature also finds and declares that, because of the instability of delta soils, the effect of winds, tides, and floodflows, and the unique problems of erosion, seepage, and subsidence, the same security against levee failure and flooding cannot be achieved by protective works in the delta as in areas less vulnerable to these problems. Although the rehabilitation and maintenance of delta levees is an important undertaking, a significant risk of levee failure will still persist.

The purpose of the state’s approval of plans and inspection of works, which duties are set forth in this part, is to ensure that subvention funds are properly expended and that delta levees are effectively rehabilitated and maintained, and the state does not thereby assume any responsibility for the safety of any delta levee against failure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 824, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

12984.

The department shall develop and submit to the board, for adoption by the board, criteria for the maintenance and improvement of nonproject levees. The criteria shall vary as required to meet specific conditions and shall be multipurpose in nature, and include environmental considerations, when feasible. The criteria shall embody and implement both of the following:

(a) The short-term mitigation plan set forth in the “Flood Hazard Mitigation Plan for the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta,” prepared by the department for the Office of Emergency Services, dated September 15, 1983, or as amended.

(b) The “Vegetation Management Guidelines for Local Nonproject Delta Levees” dated April 1994, or any successor guidelines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 601, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12985.

Prior to adoption of any such criteria, the board shall hold public hearings and may revise the criteria as it determines necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 717.)
-------------------------------------------

12986.

(a) The department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall reimburse an eligible local agency pursuant to this part for costs incurred in any year for the maintenance or improvement of project or nonproject levees as follows:

(1) Costs incurred shall not be reimbursed if the entire cost incurred per mile of project or nonproject levee is either of the following:

(A) Two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or less for a project or nonproject levee in an urban area.

(B) One thousand dollars ($1,000) or less for a project or nonproject levee in a rural area.

(2) Not
 more than 75 percent of any costs incurred in excess of the amount per mile of project or nonproject levee specified in paragraph (1) shall be reimbursed.

(3) In addition to project plans approved by the board, the department shall require the local agency to provide information to the department that may include, but is not limited to, a detailed engineer’s report prepared pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4 of Article XIII D of the California Constitution, audited financial statements, or an assessment commissioners’ report. The information provided to the department shall be the basis for determining the maximum allowable reimbursement eligible under this part. Nothing in this paragraph shall be interpreted to increase the maximum reimbursement allowed under paragraph (2).

(4) Reimbursements made to the local agency in excess of the maximum allowable reimbursement shall be
 returned to the department.

(5) All final costs allocated or reimbursed under a plan shall be approved by the Central Valley Flood Protection Board for project and nonproject levee work.

(6) Costs incurred pursuant to this part that are eligible for reimbursement include construction costs and associated engineering services, financial or economic analyses, environmental costs, mitigation costs, and habitat improvement costs.

(b) Upon completion of its evaluation pursuant to Sections 139.2 and 139.4, by January 1, 2008, the department shall recommend to the Legislature and the Governor priorities for funding under this section.

(c) Reimbursements made pursuant to this section shall reflect the priorities of, and be consistent with, the Delta Plan
 established pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 85300) of Part 4 of Division 35.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Rural area” means an area that is not an urban area.

(2) “Urban area” means an area in which 10 percent or more of the land area within the project area is used for residential use.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 549, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 50.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12987.

(a) Local agencies maintaining project or nonproject levees shall be eligible for reimbursement pursuant to this part upon submission to and approval by the board of plans for the maintenance and improvement of the project or nonproject levees, including plans for the annual routine maintenance of the levees, in accordance with the criteria adopted by the board.

(b) The nonproject plans shall also be compatible with the plan for improvement of the delta levees as set forth in Bulletin No. 192-82 of the department, dated December 1982, and as approved in Section 12225. Both project and nonproject plans shall include provisions to acquire easements along levees that allow for the control and reversal of subsidence in areas where the department determines that such an easement is desirable to maintain structural stability of the levee. The easement shall (1) restrict the use of the land to open-space uses, nontillable crops, the propagation of wildlife habitat, and other compatible uses, (2) provide full access to the local agency for levee maintenance and improvement purposes, and (3) allow the owner to retain reasonable rights of ingress and egress as well as reasonable rights of access to the waterways for water supply and drainage. The local agency cost of acquisition of the easements shall be reimbursable by the department from moneys appropriated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 12300, or any other sources appropriated by the Legislature for purposes of this part.

(c) The plans shall also include provision for protection of the fish and wildlife habitat determined to be necessary by the Department of Fish and Game and not injurious to the integrity of the levee. The Department of Fish and Game shall consider the value of the riparian and fisheries habitat and the need to provide safe levees in preparing its requirements. The Department of Fish and Game shall not approve any plan which calls for the use of channel islands or berms with significant riparian communities as borrow sites for levee repair material, unless fully mitigated, or any plans which will result in a net long-term loss of riparian, fisheries, or wildlife habitat.

(d) After the memorandum of understanding required pursuant to Section 12307 is amended as required by Section 78543, the Department of Fish and Game shall also make a written determination as part of its review and approval of a plan or project pursuant to Section 12314 and this section that the proposed expenditures are consistent with a net long-term habitat improvement program and have a net benefit for aquatic species in the delta. The memorandum of understanding in effect prior to the amendments required by Section 78543 shall remain in effect with regard to levee projects and plans until the memorandum of understanding is amended.

(e) The plans shall also take into account the most recently updated Delta Master Recreation Plan prepared by the Resources Agency.

(f) Upon approval of the plans by the board, the local agencies shall enter into an agreement with the board to perform the maintenance and improvement work, including the annual routine maintenance work, specified in the plans. If applications for state funding in any year exceed the state funds available, the board shall apportion the funds among those levees or levee segments that are identified by the department as most critical and beneficial, considering the needs of flood control, water quality, recreation, navigation, habitat improvements, and fish and wildlife.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 601, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12987.5.

(a) In an agreement entered into under Section 12987, the board may provide for an advance to the applicant in an amount not to exceed 75 percent of the estimated state share. The agreement shall provide that no advance shall be made until the applicant has incurred costs consistent with the criteria outlined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 12986.

(b) Advances made under subdivision (a) shall be subtracted from amounts to be reimbursed after the work has been performed. If the department finds that work has not been satisfactorily performed or where advances made actually exceed reimbursable costs, the local agency shall promptly remit to the state all amounts advanced in excess of reimbursable costs. If advances are sought, the board may require a
 bond to be posted to ensure the faithful performance of the work set forth in the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 453, Sec. 5.   (SB 875)   Effective September 17, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12988.

Upon the completion in any year of the maintenance or improvement work, including annual routine maintenance work, as specified in the plans approved by the board, the local agency shall notify the department, and the department shall inspect the completed work. The department, upon completion of such inspection, shall submit to the board a report as to its findings. Upon a finding that the work has been satisfactorily completed in accordance with the approved plans, the board shall certify for reimbursement 75 percent of any costs incurred per mile of levee if the entire cost incurred per mile of levee is greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 601, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12989.

(a) The department shall conduct at least one annual inspection of every levee for which maintenance or improvement costs have been reimbursed pursuant to this part. In addition, the department shall inspect nonproject levees of local agencies for the purpose of monitoring and ascertaining the degree of compliance with, or progress toward meeting, standards such as those set forth in Section 12984.

(b) The local agency shall cooperate with the department in the conduct of these inspections, including the provision of reasonable access over local agency lands and easements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 601, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12990.

Whenever the department finds that the annual routine maintenance work specified in the plans approved by the board is not being performed in accordance with the agreement entered into between the local agency and the board, the department may establish a maintenance area in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 12878) of Part 6 of this division, as nearly as the same may be applicable, except that the work to be performed shall be the routine annual maintenance work for the nonproject levee as specified in the plans approved by the board. Upon the formation of a maintenance area, the department shall thereafter annually maintain the nonproject levee in accordance with such plans and subject to the provisions of Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 12878) of Part 6 of this division, as nearly as the same may be applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 717.)
-------------------------------------------

12991.

The board is authorized to make, from time to time, such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out, and as are consistent with, this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 717.)
-------------------------------------------

12992.

Before any plan is approved, agreement entered into, or moneys advanced or reimbursed under this part, the local agency shall first enter into an agreement with the board indemnifying and holding and saving the State of California, the board, the department, any other agency or department of the state, and their employees free from any and all liability for damages, except that caused by gross negligence, that may arise out of the approvals, agreements, inspections, or work performed under this part.

Any funds appropriated for any of the purposes of this part may be used to satisfy any judgment against the state covered by this section, pending indemnification by the local agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 28, Sec. 9.   Effective March 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

12993.

Applicants shall apply for federal disaster assistance, whenever eligible, under Public Law 93-288. If, and to the extent that, it is determined that the work performed does not qualify for federal disaster assistance, the applicant may apply for reimbursement under Section 12986, and the costs shall be deemed incurred by the applicant in the year in which the latter application is filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 28, Sec. 10.   Effective March 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

12994.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The CALFED Bay-Delta Program has identified as a core action the need for emergency levee management planning for delta levees to improve system reliability.

(2) Even with active levee maintenance, the threat of delta levee failures from earthquake, flood, or poor levee foundation, will continue to exist.

(3) Because of this threat of failure, and the potential need to mobilize people and equipment in an emergency to protect delta levees and public benefits, the department needs authority that will
 enable it to act quickly.

(b) The department may do all of the following:

(1) In an emergency, as defined by Section 21060.3 of the Public Resources Code, that requires immediate levee work to protect public benefits in the delta, the department may use funds pursuant to this part without prior approval of a plan by the board or the Department of Fish and Wildlife, in which case the requirements of Sections 12314 and 12987, and the memorandum of understanding pursuant to Section 12307, shall be carried out as soon as possible.

(A) The amount of funds that may be expended each year on emergency levee work under this section shall not be greater than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) and the amount that may be
 expended per emergency levee site shall not be greater than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). The local agency shall fund 25 percent of the total costs of the emergency repair at a site or shall fund an appropriate share of the costs as approved by the board and based upon information of the local agency’s ability to pay for the repairs.

(B) Department contracts executed for emergency levee work under this section shall be exempted from Department of General Services approval required under the Public Contract Code.

(C) As soon as feasible after the emergency repair, the department shall submit a report to the board describing the levee work, costs incurred, and plans for future work at the site, including any necessary mitigation.

(D) This section is intended to supplement emergency services provided by the state or the United States. Nothing in this section overrides or supersedes the authority of the Director of Emergency Services under the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code) or the Disaster Assistance Act (Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 8680) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(2) Prepare and submit to the board for adoption a delta emergency response plan for levee failures. The plan is exempt from Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The plan may include recommendations of the multiagency response team established pursuant to paragraph (3) and may include, but not be limited
 to, the following:

(A) Standardized contracts for emergency levee work to be executed by the department, local agencies, or other appropriate entities.

(B) Criteria for eligible emergency levee work.

(C) Definition of an emergency levee site.

(D) Documentation requirements.

(E) Proposals for complying with the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.) and the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code) in an emergency.

(F) Stages
 of emergency response that may occur in various situations.

(3) Establish a multiagency emergency response team, consisting of representatives from the department, the board, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the California Conservation Corps, the Office of Emergency Services, the Federal Emergency Management Agency, the United States Army Corps of Engineers, and the United States Fish and Wildlife Service to advise on methods to ensure that levee emergencies will be resolved as quickly and safely as possible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 531.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

12995.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares both of the following:

(1) There is an urgent need for rehabilitation and improvement of delta levees, and that the United States Army Corps of Engineers has a crucial and continuing role in that work.

(2) The department and the board have been cooperating with the United States Army Corps of Engineers in a feasibility study for rehabilitation and improvement of the levees in the delta. That feasibility study identified a federal interest in levee rehabilitation and improvements due to benefits to navigation, commerce, the environment, and flood damage reduction.

(b) The department and the board may cooperate with the United States Army Corps of Engineers to develop and implement delta levee rehabilitation, improvement, and realignment, and to enhance the environment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 601, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 11. TAMARISK PLANT CONTROL [12999. - 12999.]

12999.

(a) The department, in collaboration with the Department of Food and Agriculture, the Department of Fish and Game, and the Colorado River Board of California may cooperate with the federal government, the other Colorado River Basin states, and other entities for the purpose of preparing a plan to control or eradicate tamarisk in the Colorado River watershed. The department, the Department of Food and Agriculture, the Department of Fish and Game, and the Colorado River Board of California shall seek to collaborate with affected California water agencies and other appropriate entities in that preparation. The plan shall include the reestablishment of native vegetation and the identification of potential federal and nonfederal funding sources for implementation pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) The department, in collaboration with the Department of Food and Agriculture, the Department of Fish and Game, the Colorado River Board of California, and appropriate federal agencies, shall implement the plan within California upon the appropriation of funds for that purpose. The department, the Department of Food and Agriculture, the Department of Fish and Game, and the Colorado River Board of California shall seek to collaborate with affected California water agencies and other appropriate entities in the implementation of the plan.

(c) This section does not preclude the department or any other entity from expending bond funds or nonstate funds for the control or eradication of tamarisk in the Colorado River watershed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 710, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 7. WATER QUALITY [13000. - 16201.]



CHAPTER 1. Policy [13000. - 13002.]

13000.

The Legislature finds and declares that the people of the state have a primary interest in the conservation, control, and utilization of the water resources of the state, and that the quality of all the waters of the state shall be protected for use and enjoyment by the people of the state.

The Legislature further finds and declares that activities and factors which may affect the quality of the waters of the state shall be regulated to attain the highest water quality which is reasonable, considering all demands being made and to be made on those waters and the total values involved, beneficial and detrimental, economic and social, tangible and intangible.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the health, safety and welfare of the people of the state requires that there be a statewide program for the control of the quality of all the waters of the state; that the state must be prepared to exercise its full power and jurisdiction to protect the quality of waters in the state from degradation originating inside or outside the boundaries of the state; that the waters of the state are increasingly influenced by interbasin water development projects and other statewide considerations; that factors of precipitation, topography, population, recreation, agriculture, industry and economic development vary from region to region within the state; and that the statewide program for water quality control can be most effectively administered regionally, within a framework of statewide coordination and policy.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13001.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the state board and each regional board shall be the principal state agencies with primary responsibility for the coordination and control of water quality. The state board and regional boards in exercising any power granted in this division shall conform to and implement the policies of this chapter and shall, at all times, coordinate their respective activities so as to achieve a unified and effective water quality control program in this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13002.

No provision of this division or any ruling of the state board or a regional board is a limitation:

(a) On the power of a city or county or city and county to adopt and enforce additional regulations, not in conflict therewith, imposing further conditions, restrictions, or limitations with respect to the disposal of waste or any other activity which might degrade the quality of the waters of the state.

(b) On the power of any city or county or city and county to declare, prohibit, and abate nuisances.

(c) On the power of the Attorney General, at the request of a regional board, the state board, or upon his own motion, to bring an action in the name of the people of the State of California to enjoin any pollution or nuisance.

(d) On the power of a state agency in the enforcement or administration of any provision of law which it is specifically permitted or required to enforce or administer.

(e) On the right of any person to maintain at any time any appropriate action for relief against any private nuisance as defined in the Civil Code or for relief against any contamination or pollution.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.5. Short Title [13020. - 13020.]

13020.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Porter-Cologne Water Quality Control Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [13050. - 13051.]

13050.

As used in this division:

(a) “State board” means the State Water Resources Control Board. 

(b) “Regional board” means any California regional water quality control board for a region as specified in Section 13200.

(c) “Person” includes any city, county, district, the state, and the United States, to the extent authorized by federal law.

(d) “Waste” includes sewage and any and all other waste substances, liquid, solid, gaseous, or radioactive, associated with human habitation, or of human or animal origin, or from any producing, manufacturing, or processing operation, including waste placed within containers of whatever nature prior to, and for purposes of, disposal.

(e) “Waters of the state” means any surface water or groundwater, including saline waters, within the boundaries of the state.

(f) “Beneficial uses” of the waters of the state that may be protected against quality degradation include, but are not limited to, domestic, municipal, agricultural and industrial supply; power generation; recreation; aesthetic enjoyment; navigation; and preservation and enhancement of fish, wildlife, and other aquatic resources or preserves.

(g) “Quality of the water” refers to chemical, physical, biological, bacteriological, radiological, and other properties and characteristics of water which affect its use.

(h) “Water quality objectives” means the limits or levels of water quality constituents or characteristics which are established for the reasonable protection of beneficial uses of water or the prevention of nuisance within a specific area.

(i) “Water quality control” means the regulation of any activity or factor which may affect the quality of the waters of the state and includes the prevention and correction of water pollution and nuisance. 

(j) “Water quality control plan” consists of a designation or establishment for the waters within a specified area of all of the following:

(1) Beneficial uses to be protected. 

(2) Water quality objectives. 
